Washington statutes.
RCW 18.84.180

Unprofessional conduct.

It is unprofessional conduct under chapter 18.130 RCW for any person registered or certified under this chapter to interpret images, make diagnoses, prescribe medications or therapies, or perform other procedures that may be prohibited by rule.

[ 2008 c 246 s 6.]